Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2017.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Office of State Aid Road Construction Fund, for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the Office of State Aid Road Construction of the Mississippi Department of Transportation for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026 $   235,736,074.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:                $         0.00 Special Funds:                $ 5,257,310.00 Total Funds:                  $ 5,257,310.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:             $ 4,865,799.00 Progressions:                 $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:              $   391,511.00 Total Personal Services:       $ 5,257,310.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent: 54 Time-Limited: 0 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that an amount not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) is authorized to be expended from funds received from the Mississippi Development Authority as reimbursements for actual expenses incurred by the Office of State Aid Road Construction for administering and providing engineering services to political subdivisions as authorized under Section 65-4-15, Mississippi Code of 1972. Any such funds shall be deposited into the Office of State Aid Roads Administrative Fund for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026. SECTION 4.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, Fifty-five Million Dollars ($55,000,000.00) is provided for the purpose of replacement of structurally deficient bridges on the Local System Bridge Program (LSBP). SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Office of State Aid Road Construction shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 6.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Administrative Percent of Administrative Costs as Compared to Construction Costs                     4.00 Maintain Level of Administrative Costs as Compared to Construction Costs at 5% or Under                                          5.00 Number of Projects Let to Contract                        75 Percent of Personnel Devoted to Construction Programs                             81.00 Federal Percent of Total Project Fund Obligations                                       20.00 Construction Percent Increase in Total Miles Paved                   1.00 Percent of Total State Aid Funds Available Programmed or Obligated to Projects                                         70.00 Number of State Aid Projects Let to Contract               75 Number of Federal Projects Let to Contract                 5 Number of State Aid Projects Completed                    30 Number of Federal Projects Completed                      10 Average Time from Initiation to Completion of a Fed Project (Days)                  450 Number of Bridges Replaced or Repaired                    85 Number of Structurally Deficient Bridges on the State Aid System                           1,050 Average Cost of a State Aid/Federal Bridge Project                             1,550,000.00 Local System Bridge Percent Change in Deficient LSBP Bridges                 3.00 Average Number of Active LSBP Projects Per County                                         1.00 Percent of LSBP Funds Available Programmed or Obligated to Projects                85.00 Number of LSBP Projects Let to Contract                   40 Number of LSBP Projects Completed                         70 Number of LSBP Bridges Replaced or Repaired                40 Number of Eligible Deficient LSBP Bridges               1,050 Average Time From Initiation to Completion of a LSBP Project (Days)                 450 Percent of Bridges Eligible for LSBP Funds              10.00 Percent of Counties Utilizing All of Their Available LSBP Funds                        30.00 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 7.  With the funds appropriated in this act, the Office of State Aid Road Construction shall notify members of the Mississippi Senate and House of Representatives upon the award of projects within their respective districts and at least five (5) days prior to a public ceremony announcing the award of any grant in their district or any public announcement or ceremony regarding the groundbreaking or opening of a facility, roadway or bridge for which the Legislature has made funds available.  Any signage regarding any public event or any new facility, roadway or bridge shall include the following language:  "Funds were made available for this project by the Mississippi State Legislature."  The signage shall further state the four-year legislative term in which the project was funded. SECTION 8.  It is the intention of the Legislature to authorize the State Aid Engineer to utilize funds available to the Office of State Aid Road Construction, from any source herein appropriated or made available by the counties or any other source, to pay for costs necessary to comply with the National Bridge Inspection Standards and the Federal Highway Administration's requirements for bridge inspections and/or special studies necessary to comply with federal laws.  The State Aid Engineer shall follow the same procedures as have heretofore been established by Sections 65-9-9, 65-9-15 and 65-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, for payment of such costs.  The Office of State Aid Road Construction may accept, budget and expend these funds subject to and in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal or state funds. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that in the letting of contracts for which the Office of State Aid Road Construction administers and provides engineering services to political subdivisions under the Economic Development Highway Act, bids may be made from the lowest and best bidder after advertising for competitive sealed bids once in a newspaper published or having a circulation in the county or municipality where the contract will be performed, and the date published for the bid opening may be not less than seven (7) working days after the advertisement is published. SECTION 10.  The State Engineer is hereby authorized to transfer from any special fund to another special fund under the control of State Aid Road for the administration, planning, construction, maintenance, or inspection of Mississippi roads and bridges, provided that such transfers do not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total fund allocated for this purpose.  The State Aid Engineer shall submit written notification to the State Fiscal Officer and the Legislative Budget Office prior to executing any such transfer, detailing the amount and purpose of the transfer. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 12.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the funds herein appropriated shall be expended in compliance with Section 27-104-25, Mississippi Code of 1972, that no state agency shall incur obligations or indebtedness in excess of their appropriation and that the responsible officers, either personally or upon their official bonds, shall be held responsible for actions contrary to this provision. SECTION 13.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Project Poppy Fund, as created in Section 57-1-631, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office.  These funds are provided for expediting services needed for Project Poppy. SECTION 14.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.